Nevada, session 83, SB240.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 76.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
76.100 1. A person shall not conduct a business in this State
unless and until the person obtains a state business license issued by
the Secretary of State. If the person is:
(a) An entity required to file an initial or annual list with the
Secretary of State pursuant to this title, the person must obtain the
state business license at the time of filing the initial or annual list.
(b) Not an entity required to file an initial or annual list with the
Secretary of State pursuant to this title, the person must obtain the
state business license before conducting a business in this State.
2. An application for a state business license must:
-
*SB240_R2*

– 2 –
(a) Be made upon a form prescribed by the Secretary of State;
(b) Set forth the name under which the applicant transacts or
intends to transact business, or if the applicant is an entity organized
pursuant to this title and on file with the Secretary of State, the exact
name on file with the Secretary of State, the business identification
number as assigned by the Secretary of State pursuant to NRS
225.082, and the location in this State of the place or places of
business;
(c) [Be] Unless a reduced fee is otherwise provided in
subsection 8, be accompanied by a fee in the amount of $200 [,
except that] or, if the applicant is a corporation organized pursuant
to chapter 78, 78A or 78B of NRS, or a foreign corporation required
to file an initial or annual list with the Secretary of State pursuant to
chapter 80 of NRS, [the application must be accompanied by] a fee
of $500; and
(d) Include any other information that the Secretary of State
deems necessary.
 If the applicant is an entity organized pursuant to this title and on
file with the Secretary of State and the applicant has no location in
this State of its place of business, the address of its registered agent
shall be deemed to be the location in this State of its place of
business.
3. The application must be signed pursuant to NRS 239.330 by:
(a) The owner of a business that is owned by a natural person.
(b) A member or partner of an association or partnership.
(c) A general partner of a limited partnership.
(d) A managing partner of a limited-liability partnership.
(e) A manager or managing member of a limited-liability
company.
(f) An officer of a corporation or some other person specifically
authorized by the corporation to sign the application.
4. If the application for a state business license is defective in
any respect or the fee required by this section is not paid, the
Secretary of State may return the application for correction or
payment.
5. A state business license issued pursuant to this section must
contain the business identification number assigned by the Secretary
of State pursuant to NRS 225.082.
6. The state business license required to be obtained pursuant
to this section is in addition to any license to conduct business that
must be obtained from the local jurisdiction in which the business is
being conducted.
7. For the purposes of this chapter, a person:
(a) Shall be deemed to conduct a business in this State if a
business for which the person is responsible:
-
*SB240_R2*

– 3 –
(1) Is organized pursuant to this title, other than a business
organized pursuant to:
(I) Chapter 82 or 84 of NRS; or
(II) Chapter 81 of NRS if the business is a nonprofit unit-
owners’ association or a nonprofit religious, charitable, fraternal or
other organization that qualifies as a tax-exempt organization
pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 501(c);
(2) Has an office or other base of operations in this State;
(3) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 76.103, has a
registered agent in this State; or
(4) Pays wages or other remuneration to a natural person
who performs in this State any of the duties for which he or she is
paid.
(b) Shall be deemed not to conduct a business in this State if:
(1) The business for which the person is responsible:
(I) Is not organized pursuant to this title;
(II) Does not have an office or base of operations in this
State;
(III) Does not have a registered agent in this State; and
(IV) Does not pay wages or other remuneration to a
natural person who performs in this State any of the duties for which
he or she is paid, other than wages or other remuneration paid to a
natural person for performing duties in connection with an activity
described in subparagraph (2);
(2) The business for which the person is responsible is
conducting activity in this State solely to provide vehicles or
equipment on a short-term basis in response to a wildland fire, a
flood, an earthquake or another emergency; or
(3) The Secretary of State determines that the person is not
conducting a business in this State.
8. If an applicant for a state business license is a sole
proprietorship, limited-liability company, limited partnership or
general partnership which employs not more than 50 full-time or
part-time employees, the application must be accompanied by a fee
of $100.
9. As used in this section, “registered agent” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 77.230.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2027.
H
-
*SB240_R2*